Maryland, session 2026, SB0837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(P) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–142(F) OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY
TO MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS.
15–103.
(b) (34) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT REQUIRE A PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG THAT HAS BEEN REVIEWED BY THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG AFFORDABILITY BOARD IF THE BOARD:
(I) HAS NOT MADE A DETERMINATION THAT THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG HAS LED OR WILL LEAD TO AN AFFORDABILITY CHALLENGE
UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) HAS MADE A POLICY RECOMMENDATION RELATING TO THE
DRUG TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(III) HAS SET AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT FOR THE DRUG UNDER
§ 21–2C–14 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(35) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “LIMIT, RESTRICT, OR EXCLUDE”
INCLUDES:
1. LIMITING OR REDUCING THE MAXIMUM COVERAGE
OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG BENEFITS;
2. INCREASING THE COST SHARING FOR A COVERED
PRESCRIPTION DRUG;

SENATE BILL 837 3
3. MOVING A PRESCRIPTION DRUG TO A MORE
RESTRICTIVE TIER IF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION USES A FORMULARY WITH
TIERS; AND
4. REMOVING A PRESCRIPTION DRUG FROM A
FORMULARY, UNLESS:
A. THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION HAS
ISSUED A STATEMENT ABOUT THE DRUG THAT CALLS INTO QUESTION THE CLINICAL
SAFETY OF THE DRUG; OR
B. THE MANUFACTURER OF THE DRUG HAS NOTIFIED
THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION OF A MANUFACTURING
DISCONTINUANCE OR POTENTIAL DISCONTINUANCE AS REQUIRED UNDER § 506C
OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT.
(II) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT LIMIT,
RESTRICT, OR EXCLUDE COVERAGE OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG ON THE MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION’S FORMULARY IF THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG HAS BEEN
REVIEWED BY THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG AFFORDABILITY BOARD AND THE BOARD:
1. HAS NOT MADE A DETERMINATION THAT THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG HAS LED OR WILL LEAD TO AN AFFORDABILITY CHALLENGE
UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THIS ARTICLE;
2. HAS MADE A POLICY RECOMMENDATION RELATING
TO THE DRUG TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THIS ARTICLE;
OR
3. HAS SET AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT FOR THE DRUG
UNDER § 21–2C–14 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–142.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Step therapy drug” means a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs required to be used under a step therapy or fail–first protocol.

SENATE BILL 837
(3) “Step therapy exception request” means a request to override a step
therapy or fail–first protocol.
(4) (i) “Step therapy or fail–first protocol” means a protocol established
by an insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance organization that
requires a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs to be used by an insured or
an enrollee before a prescription drug ordered by a prescriber for the insured or the enrollee
is covered.
(ii) “Step therapy or fail–first protocol” includes a protocol that
meets the definition under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph regardless of the name, label,
or terminology used by the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization to identify the protocol.
(5) “Supporting medical information” means:
(i) a paid claim from an entity subject to this section for an insured
or an enrollee;
(ii) a pharmacy record that documents that a prescription has been
filled and delivered to an insured or an enrollee, or a representative of an insured or an
enrollee; or
(iii) other information mutually agreed on by an entity subject to this
section and the prescriber of an insured or an enrollee.
(b) (1) This section applies to:
(i) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(ii) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or
delivered in the State.
(2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefits
manager is subject to the requirements of this section.
(F) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A STEP
THERAPY OR FAIL–FIRST PROTOCOL ON AN INSURED OR AN ENROLLEE FOR A
PRESCRIPTION DRUG THAT HAS BEEN REVIEWED BY THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG
AFFORDABILITY BOARD IF THE BOARD:

SENATE BILL 837 5
(1) HAS NOT MADE A DETERMINATION THAT THE PRESCRIPTION
DRUG HAS LED OR WILL LEAD TO AN AFFORDABILITY CHALLENGE UNDER §
21–2C–09 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) HAS MADE A POLICY RECOMMENDATION RELATING TO THE DRUG
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE; OR
(3) HAS SET AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT FOR THE DRUG UNDER §
21–2C–14 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(f)] (G) (1) An entity subject to this section shall establish a process for
requesting an exception to a step therapy or fail–first protocol that is:
(i) clearly described, including the specific information and
documentation, if needed, that must be submitted by the prescriber to be considered a
complete step therapy exception request;
(ii) easily accessible to the prescriber; and
(iii) posted on the entity’s website.
(2) A step therapy exception request shall be granted if, based on the
professional judgment of the prescriber and any information and documentation required
under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection:
(i) the step therapy drug is contraindicated or will likely cause an
adverse reaction to the insured or enrollee;
(ii) the step therapy drug is expected to be ineffective based on the
known clinical characteristics of the insured or enrollee and the known characteristics of
the prescription drug regimen;
(iii) the insured or enrollee is stable on a prescription drug prescribed
for the medical condition under consideration while covered under the policy or contract of
the entity or under a previous source of coverage; or
(iv) while covered under the policy or contract of the entity or a
previous source of coverage, the insured or enrollee has tried a prescription drug that:
1. is in the same pharmacologic class or has the same
mechanism of action as the step therapy drug; and
2. was discontinued by the prescriber due to lack of efficacy
or effectiveness, diminished effect, or an adverse event.

SENATE BILL 837
(3) On granting a step therapy exception request, an entity subject to this
section shall authorize coverage for the prescription drug ordered by the prescriber for an
insured or enrollee.
(4) An enrollee or insured may appeal a step therapy exception request
denial in accordance with Subtitle 10A or Subtitle 10B of this title.
(5) This subsection may not be construed to:
(i) prevent:
1. an entity subject to this section from requiring an insured
or enrollee to try an AB–rated generic equivalent or interchangeable biological product
before providing coverage for the equivalent branded prescription drug; or
2. a health care provider from prescribing a prescription
drug that is determined to be medically appropriate; or
(ii) require an entity subject to this section to provide coverage for a
prescription drug that is not covered by a policy or contract of the entity.
(6) An entity subject to this section may use an existing step therapy
exception process that satisfies the requirements under this subsection.
15–831.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Authorized prescriber” has the meaning stated in § 12–101 of the
Health Occupations Article.
(3) “Formulary” means a list of prescription drugs or devices that are
covered by an entity subject to this section.
(4) (i) “Member” means an individual entitled to health care benefits
for prescription drugs or devices under a policy issued or delivered in the State by an entity
subject to this section.
(ii) “Member” includes a subscriber.
(b) (1) This section applies to:
(i) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide coverage
for prescription drugs and devices under individual, group, or blanket health insurance
policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and

SENATE BILL 837 7
(ii) health maintenance organizations that provide coverage for
prescription drugs and devices under individual or group contracts that are issued or
delivered in the State.
(2) An insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs and devices through a pharmacy
benefits manager is subject to the requirements of this section.
(3) This section does not apply to a managed care organization as defined
in § 15–101 of the Health – General Article.
(c) Each entity subject to this section that limits its coverage of prescription drugs
or devices to those in a formulary shall establish and implement a procedure by which a
member may:
(1) receive a prescription drug or device that is not in the entity’s formulary
or has been removed from the entity’s formulary in accordance with this section; or
(2) continue the same cost sharing requirements if the entity has moved
the prescription drug or device to a higher deductible, copayment, or coinsurance tier.
(d) The procedure shall provide for coverage for a prescription drug or device in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section if, in the judgment of the authorized
prescriber:
(1) there is no equivalent prescription drug or device in the entity’s
formulary in a lower tier;
(2) an equivalent prescription drug or device in the entity’s formulary in a
lower tier:
(i) has been ineffective in treating the disease or condition of the
member; or
(ii) has caused or is likely to cause an adverse reaction or other harm
to the member; or
(3) for a contraceptive prescription drug or device, the prescription drug or
device that is not on the formulary is medically necessary for the member to adhere to the
appropriate use of the prescription drug or device.
(e) A decision by an entity subject to this section not to provide access to or
coverage of a prescription drug or device in accordance with this section constitutes an
adverse decision as defined under Subtitle 10A of this title if the decision is based on a
finding that the proposed drug or device is not medically necessary, appropriate, or
efficient.

SENATE BILL 837
(f) An entity subject to this section that removes a drug from its formulary or
moves a prescription drug or device to a benefit tier that requires a member to pay a higher
deductible, copayment, or coinsurance amount for the prescription drug or device shall
provide a member who is currently on the prescription drug or device and the member’s
health care provider with:
(1) notice of the change at least 30 days before the change is implemented;
and
(2) in the notice required under item (1) of this subsection, the process for
requesting an exemption through the procedure adopted in accordance with this section.
(G) (1) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “LIMIT, RESTRICT, OR EXCLUDE” INCLUDES:
(I) LIMITING OR REDUCING THE MAXIMUM COVERAGE OF
PRESCRIPTION DRUG BENEFITS;
(II) INCREASING THE COST SHARING FOR A COVERED
PRESCRIPTION DRUG;
(III) MOVING A PRESCRIPTION DRUG TO A MORE RESTRICTIVE
TIER IF THE ENTITY USES A FORMULARY WITH TIERS; AND
(IV) REMOVING A PRESCRIPTION DRUG FROM A FORMULARY,
UNLESS:
1. THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION HAS
ISSUED A STATEMENT ABOUT THE DRUG THAT CALLS INTO QUESTION THE CLINICAL
SAFETY OF THE DRUG; OR
2. THE MANUFACTURER OF THE DRUG HAS NOTIFIED
THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION OF A MANUFACTURING
DISCONTINUANCE OR POTENTIAL DISCONTINUANCE AS REQUIRED UNDER § 506C
OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT.
(2) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT LIMIT, RESTRICT,
OR EXCLUDE COVERAGE OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG ON THE ENTITY’S FORMULARY
IF THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG HAS BEEN REVIEWED BY THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG
AFFORDABILITY BOARD AND THE BOARD:
(I) HAS NOT MADE A DETERMINATION THAT THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG HAS LED OR WILL LEAD TO AN AFFORDABILITY CHALLENGE
UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 837 9
(II) HAS MADE A POLICY RECOMMENDATION RELATING TO THE
DRUG TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE; OR
(III) HAS SET AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT FOR THE DRUG UNDER
§ 21–2C–14 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
15–854.
(a) (1) This section applies to:
(i) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide coverage
for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefit under individual, group, or blanket
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(ii) health maintenance organizations that provide coverage for
prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefit under individual or group contracts that
are issued or delivered in the State.
(2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefits
manager or that contracts with a private review agent under Subtitle 10B of this title is
subject to the requirements of this section.
(3) This section does not apply to a managed care organization as defined
in § 15–101 of the Health – General Article.
(b) (1) (i) If an entity subject to this section requires a prior authorization
for a prescription drug, the prior authorization request shall allow a health care provider
to indicate whether a prescription drug is to be used to treat a chronic condition.
(ii) If a health care provider indicates that the prescription drug is
to treat a chronic condition, an entity subject to this section may not request a
reauthorization for a repeat prescription for the prescription drug for 1 year or for the
standard course of treatment for the chronic condition being treated, whichever is less.
(2) For a prior authorization that is filed electronically, the entity shall
maintain a database that will prepopulate prior authorization requests with an insured’s
available insurance and demographic information.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT REQUIRE A PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG THAT HAS BEEN REVIEWED BY THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG AFFORDABILITY BOARD IF THE BOARD:

SENATE BILL 837
(1) HAS NOT MADE A DETERMINATION THAT THE PRESCRIPTION
DRUG HAS LED OR WILL LEAD TO AN AFFORDABILITY CHALLENGE UNDER §
21–2C–09 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) HAS MADE A POLICY RECOMMENDATION RELATING TO THE DRUG
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER § 21–2C–09 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE; OR
(3) HAS SET AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT FOR THE DRUG UNDER §
21–2C–14 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(c)] (D) (1) On receipt of information documenting a prior authorization
from the insured or from the insured’s health care provider, an entity subject to this section
shall honor a prior authorization granted to an insured from a previous entity for at least
the lesser of 90 days or the length of the course of treatment.
(2) During the time period described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, an
entity may perform its own review to grant a prior authorization for the prescription drug.
[(d)] (E) (1) An entity subject to this section shall honor a prior authorization
issued by the entity for a prescription drug and may not require a health care provider to
submit a request for another prior authorization for the prescription drug:
(i) if the insured changes health benefit plans that are both covered
by the same entity and the prescription drug is a covered benefit under the current health
benefit plan; or
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, when the
dosage for the approved prescription drug changes and the change is consistent with federal
Food and Drug Administration labeled dosages.
(2) Except as provided in § 15–851 of this subtitle, an entity may require a
prior authorization for a change in dosage for an opioid under this subsection.
[(e)] (F) (1) If an entity under this section implements a new prior
authorization requirement for a prescription drug, the entity shall provide notice of the new
requirement at least 60 days before the implementation of a new prior authorization
requirement:
(i) in writing to any insured who is prescribed the prescription drug;
and
(ii) either in writing or electronically to all contracted health care
providers.

SENATE BILL 837 11
(2) The notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
indicate that the insured may remain on the prescription drug at the time of
reauthorization in accordance with subsection [(g)] (H) of this section.
[(f)] (G) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an entity
subject to this section may not require more than one prior authorization if two or more
tablets of different dosage strengths of the same prescription drug are:
(i) prescribed at the same time as part of an insured’s treatment
plan; and
(ii) manufactured by the same manufacturer.
(2) This subsection does not prohibit an entity from requiring more than
one prior authorization if the prescription is for two or more tablets of different dosage
strengths of an opioid that is not an opioid partial agonist.
[(g)] (H) (1) An entity subject to this section may not issue an adverse
decision on a reauthorization for the same prescription drug or request additional
documentation from the prescriber for the reauthorization request if:
(i) the prescription drug is:
1. an immune globulin (human) as defined in 21 C.F.R. §
640.100; or
2. used for the treatment of a mental disorder listed in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published
by the American Psychiatric Association;
(ii) the entity previously approved a prior authorization for the
prescription drug for the insured;
(iii) the insured has been treated with the prescription drug without
interruption since the initial approval of the prior authorization; and
(iv) the prescriber attests that, based on the prescriber’s professional
judgment, the prescription drug continues to be necessary to effectively treat the insured’s
condition.
(2) If the prescription drug that is being requested has been removed from
the formulary or has been moved to a higher deductible, copayment, or coinsurance tier,
the entity shall provide the insured and insured’s health care provider the information
required under § 15–831 of this subtitle.

SENATE BILL 837
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2 and 3 of this Act
shall take effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.